Utah statutes.
26-23-9.   Authority of department as to functions transferred from other
agencies.
(1) If functions transferred from other agencies are vested by this code in
the department, the department shall be the successor in every way, with
respect to such functions, except as otherwise provided by this code.  Every
act done in the exercise of such functions by the department shall have the
same force and effect as if done by the agency in which the functions were
previously vested.
(2)  Whenever any such agency is referred to or designated by law, contract,
or other document, the reference or designation shall apply to the department.
